lexc/noun/enhusator.lexc
!!!enhu2- sátor.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols  +Noun[gcat]

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem 
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
      
+Abl +Acc[lfea] +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sup +Ter
      
§uue§ §J§ §UUE§ §OEOE§ §JP§ §AE§ §OEOE2§
§UUE1§ §oooe§ §oeoez2§ §AAA§ §oeoe§ §AA§ §oeoez§ §AE1§ §k§
§VV§  §oeoez11§ §OEOE11§ §ooez13§ §EOA2§ §oeoez12§
§OEOE1§ §oeoez1§
      
LEXICON Root
Noun ;

!define Cons [b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | y | z];
!define Vowel [a | á | e | é | i | í | o | ó | u | ú | ü | ű | ö | ő];
!define Root [ [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3}] | [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3} Cons^{1,4} Vowel^{0,3} ]* ] ;

LEXICON AddNoun1
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss1;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur1;

LEXICON Poss1
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez13§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA2§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez12§t       #;    ! ot, et, öt, t
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE11§m   Fam1;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE11§d   Fam1;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam1;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam1;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE11§t§OEOE§k   Fam1;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam1;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam1;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam1;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam1;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam1;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam1;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam1;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
!                                  Gen1; !required

LEXICON Plur1
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k     Gen1;
!                            Gen1; !required
        
LEXICON Fam1
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen1;
                       Gen1;

LEXICON Gen1
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case1;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi       Case1;
                         Case1;
 
LEXICON Case1
+Abl:^+cAbl^t§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t     #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^h§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^n§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^r§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^b§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§     #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^b§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^b§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l     #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^r§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor


LEXICON AddNoun
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Poss
+Tem:^+cTem^kor             #;    ! kor
                            Gen2;

LEXICON Fam
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen3;
                       Case2;

LEXICON Gen2
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case2;

! This is the secret to have bokor+Noun[gcat]+Fam+Acc[lfea]
LEXICON Gen3
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case;  !This one!!!

LEXICON Case
+Abl:^+cAbl^t§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t     #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^h§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^n§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^r§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^b§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§     #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^b§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^b§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l     #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^r§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON Case2
+Abl:^+cAbl^t§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
!+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^h§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^n§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^r§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^b§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§     #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^b§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^b§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l     #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^r§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
!+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor


!LEXICON AddNoun3
![stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss3;
![stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur3;

!LEXICON Poss3
!!+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
!!+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
!+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
!+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m        Fam3;  ! m
!+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d        Fam3;  ! d
!+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§        Fam3;  ! ja, je, a,e
!+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk         Fam3;  ! unk, ünk
!+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k Fam3;  ! etek, atok
!+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k      Fam3;  ! ük, uk
!+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im    Fam3;  ! aim
!+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id    Fam3;  ! aid
!+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i     Fam3;  ! ai, jai, ei, jei
!+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam3;  ! aink, eink
!+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k Fam3; ! aitok, eitek
!+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik    Fam3;  !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
!                               Fam3;

!LEXICON Plur3
!+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Gen3;
!                            Gen3; !required
        
!LEXICON Fam3
!+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen3;
!                       Gen3;

!LEXICON Gen3
!+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case3;
!+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi       Case3;
!                         Case3;
 
!LEXICON Case3
!+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
!+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
!+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
!+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
!+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
!+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
!+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
!+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
!+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
!+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
!+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
!+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
!+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
!+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ba, be
!+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
!+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
!+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
!+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
!+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
!+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig

LEXICON AddNounsatorunk
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Posssatorunk;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Noun
alapfogalom:alapfogalm AddNoun1;
alaptartalom AddNoun;
aszályriadalom:aszályriadalm AddNoun1;
autósátor  AddNounsatorunk;
babairodalom AddNoun;
bemutatósátor  AddNounsatorunk;
beszélgetésszorgalom:beszélgetésszorgalm AddNoun1;
bitumentartalom AddNoun;
borsátor  AddNounsatorunk;
borítóvászon:borítóvászn AddNoun1;
bungalósátor  AddNounsatorunk;
bántalom AddNoun;
békesátor  AddNounsatorunk;
bélfalizgalom:bélfalizgalm AddNoun1;
büntetősátor  AddNounsatorunk;
centrumhatalom AddNoun;
cigarettatilalom:cigarettatilalm AddNoun1;
csapatsátor  AddNounsatorunk;
cserkészsátor  AddNounsatorunk;
csillagbirodalom:csillagbirodalm AddNoun1;
csodahatalom AddNoun;
célteherforgalom:célteherforgalm AddNoun1;
címersátor  AddNounsatorunk;
designoltalom AddNoun;
dollárforgalom:dollárforgalm AddNoun1;
dzsungelsátor  AddNounsatorunk;
dörejártalom AddNoun;
egészségsátor  AddNounsatorunk;
elithatalom:elithatalm AddNoun1;
energiatartalom AddNoun;
ereszsátor  AddNounsatorunk;
erényfogalom:erényfogalm AddNoun1;
fajfogalom AddNoun;
farok:fark AddNoun1;
fellépősátor  AddNounsatorunk;
fluoridtartalom AddNoun;
focinagyhatalom:focinagyhatalm AddNoun1;
frigysátor AddNounsatorunk;
fájdalom:fájdalm AddNoun1;
fájlfogalom AddNoun;
fóliasátor  AddNounsatorunk;
füstsátor:füstsátr AddNoun1;
főuralom AddNoun;
fűsátor  AddNounsatorunk;
gondolaforgalom:gondolaforgalm AddNoun1;
grillsátor  AddNounsatorunk;
gyalogosfogalom AddNoun;
gyermeksátor  AddNounsatorunk;
gyémánttartalom:gyémánttartalm AddNoun1;
gépjárműforgalom AddNoun;
gömbsátor  AddNounsatorunk;
halajak AddNoun1;
hangsátor  AddNounsatorunk;
helyességfogalom AddNoun;
hidroxidtartalom:hidroxidtartalm AddNoun1;
hálózatforgalom AddNoun;
háttérmozgalom:háttérmozgalm AddNoun1;
imaalkalom:imaalkalm AddNoun1;
imasátor  AddNounsatorunk;
imitálásirodalom AddNoun;
irodalomsátor  AddNounsatorunk;
irídiumtartalom:irídiumtartalm AddNoun1;
ivóvíztilalom AddNoun;
jégtartalom:jégtartalm AddNoun1;
kajasátor  AddNounsatorunk;
kalandregényirodalom AddNoun;
katasztrófafogalom:katasztrófafogalm AddNoun1;
keményítőtartalom AddNoun;
kerengősátor  AddNounsatorunk;
királysátor  AddNounsatorunk;
kisajak AddNoun1;
kocsialkalom AddNoun;
kofasátor  AddNounsatorunk;
konventaggodalom:konventaggodalm AddNoun1;
krokiirodalom AddNoun;
kultúrmozgalom:kultúrmozgalm AddNoun1;
kényszerforradalom AddNoun;
kéregsátor  AddNounsatorunk;
készletforgalom:készletforgalm AddNoun1;
kölcsönsátor  AddNounsatorunk;
kötelességfogalom AddNoun;
következtetésfogalom:következtetésfogalm AddNoun1;
legendairodalom AddNoun;
legendairodalom:legendairodalm AddNoun1;
lovagsátor  AddNounsatorunk;
légyforgalom AddNoun;
malacfarok:malacfark AddNoun1;
matyólakodalom AddNoun;
mentősátor  AddNounsatorunk;
modalitásfogalom AddNoun;
mosdósátor  AddNounsatorunk;
mozivászon:mozivászn AddNoun1;
muzeológustársadalom AddNoun;
médiasátor  AddNounsatorunk;
műfajfogalom AddNoun;
művászon:művászn AddNoun1;
nemzetirodalom AddNoun;
nyuszitársadalom AddNoun;
nádsátor  AddNounsatorunk;
népdalfogalom:népdalfogalm AddNoun1;
oldalfájdalom AddNoun;
oxigénsátor  AddNounsatorunk;
papucssarok AddNoun;
papírfarok:papírfark AddNoun1;
piacsarok AddNoun;
pokrócsátor  AddNounsatorunk;
popsátor:popsátr AddNoun1;
porsátor  AddNounsatorunk;
postaforgalom AddNoun;
pártirodalom AddNoun;
pótszabadalom:pótszabadalm AddNoun1;
raktársátor  AddNounsatorunk;
realitásfogalom AddNoun;
rockfájdalom AddNoun;
romasátor  AddNounsatorunk;
ruhaforgalom:ruhaforgalm AddNoun1;
rőzsesátor  AddNounsatorunk;
sikértartalom AddNoun;
sorsirodalom:sorsirodalm AddNoun1;
sramlisátor  AddNounsatorunk;
szenzációtartalom:szenzációtartalm AddNoun1;
szerelemfogalom AddNoun;
szersátor  AddNounsatorunk;
számtartalom:számtartalm AddNoun1;
szélbántalom AddNoun;
színházsátor  AddNounsatorunk;
sámánsátor  AddNounsatorunk;
sóhajtartalom:sóhajtartalm AddNoun1;
tananyagtartalom AddNoun;
tanácskozósátor  AddNounsatorunk;
teniszsátor  AddNounsatorunk;
tervezésfogalom:tervezésfogalm AddNoun1;
toalettsátor  AddNounsatorunk;
tojástilalom AddNoun;
táncnagyhatalom:táncnagyhatalm AddNoun1;
térfogalom AddNoun;
tűzfarok:tűzfark AddNoun1;
valószínűségfogalom AddNoun;
vendéglátósátor  AddNounsatorunk;
vesekőbántalom:vesekőbántalm AddNoun1;
vodkanagyhatalom AddNoun;
vásárszabadalom:vásárszabadalm AddNoun1;
védősátor  AddNounsatorunk;
zsírtilalom AddNoun;
állkapocsfájdalom:állkapocsfájdalm AddNoun1;
érlelősátor  AddNounsatorunk;
étertartalom AddNoun;
ólomtartalom:ólomtartalm AddNoun1;
